Tennessee, session 114, HB1693.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-58-103(c), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) A certificate of release or discharge from active duty (DD-214).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1693
009325
- 1 -